Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.49.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

"Merging bank" means a party to a merger;

"Converting bank" means a bank converting from a state to a national bank, or the reverse;

"Merger" includes consolidation;

"Resulting bank" means the bank resulting from a merger or conversion.

Wherever reference is made to a vote of stockholders or a vote of classes of stockholders it shall mean only a vote of those entitled to vote under the terms of such shares.

[ 1986 c 279 s 43; 1955 c 33 s 30.49.010. Prior: 1953 c 234 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.49.010.]